Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 37-801 to 37-814 shall be known and may be cited as the Nongame and Endangered Species Conservation Act.

Laws 1975, LB 145, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 466, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-430;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 351;

Laws 2024, LB1335, § 2.